Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 6, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 275, O.S.L. 2025 (34 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 6), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6. Any person who circulates a sheet of the petition


shall be a registered voter bona fide resident of this state for not


less than one (1) year and shall verify the signatures included on


any signature sheets he or she circulates by executing his or her


affidavit thereon and as a part thereof. The Secretary of State


shall cause to be affixed onto the back of the signature form an


affidavit, subject to change, for the circulator to verify the


signatures.

Req. No. 2898 Page 1


State of Oklahoma, )


) ss.


County of ________ )


I, ______, being first duly sworn, say: That I am at least


eighteen (18) years old, a registered voter bona fide resident of


this state for not less than one (1) year, and that all signatures


on the signature sheet were signed in my presence; I believe that


each has stated his or her name, mailing address, county of


residence, and date of birth associated with his or her Oklahoma


voter registration record, and that each signer is a legal voter of


the State of Oklahoma and county of ______ or of the city of ______


(as the case may be). (Signature and complete address of affiant.)


Subscribed and sworn to before me this ________ day of ________ A.D.


20__.


(Signature and title of the Oklahoma notarial officer before


whom oath is made, and his or her complete address, commission


number and expiration date, and official Oklahoma notary public


seal.)


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 8, as last


amended by Section 3, Chapter 275, O.S.L. 2025 (34 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 8) is amended to read as follows:


Section 8. A. When a citizen or citizens desire to circulate a


petition initiating a proposition of any nature, whether to become a


statute law or an amendment to the Oklahoma Constitution, or for the

Req. No. 2898 Page 2


purpose of invoking a referendum upon legislative enactments, such


citizen or citizens shall, when such petition is prepared, and


before the same is circulated or signed by electors, file a true and


exact copy of same in the office of the Secretary of State and shall


at the same time file a separate ballot title, which shall not be


part of or printed on the petition.


B. It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to cause to


be published, in at least one newspaper of general circulation in


the state, a notice of such filing and the apparent sufficiency or


insufficiency of the petition, and shall include notice that any


citizen or citizens of the state may file a protest as to the


constitutionality of the petition, by a written notice to the


Supreme Court and to the proponent or proponents filing the


petition. Any such protest shall be filed within ninety (90) days


after publication. A copy of the protest shall be filed with the


Secretary of State.


C. Upon the filing of a protest to the petition, the Supreme


Court shall then fix a day, not less than ten (10) business days


thereafter, at which time it will hear testimony and arguments for


and against the sufficiency of such petition.


D. A protest filed by anyone hereunder may, if abandoned by the


party filing same, be revived within five (5) business days by any


other citizen. After such hearing the Supreme Court shall decide


whether such petition is in the form required by the statutes. If

Req. No. 2898 Page 3


the Court is at the time adjourned, the Chief Justice shall


immediately convene the same for such hearing. No objection to the


sufficiency shall be considered unless it has been made and filed as


herein provided.


E. Signature-gathering Deadline for Initiative Petitions. When


an initiative petition has been filed in the office of the Secretary


of State and all appeals, protests, and rehearings have been


resolved or the period for such has expired, the Secretary of State


shall set the date for circulation of signatures for the petition to


begin but in no event shall the date be less than fifteen (15) days


nor more than thirty (30) days from the date when all appeals,


protests, and rehearings have been resolved or have expired.


Notification shall be sent to the proponent or proponents specifying


the date on which circulation of the petition shall begin and that


the signatures are due within ninety (90) days of the date set. Any


person who circulates the petition to collect signatures shall be a


registered voter in bona fide resident of this state for not less


than one (1) year and shall display a conspicuous notice in any


location where the person is collecting signatures whether the


person is being paid to circulate the petition and if so, by what


person or entity. Each elector shall sign his or her name and


legibly print his or her name, birth date, address, and county of


residence associated with his or her Oklahoma voter registration


record. An elector’s signature shall serve as an attestation that

Req. No. 2898 Page 4


the elector read the gist in full or that the person who solicited


the elector’s signature read the gist in full to the elector. The


Secretary of State shall establish procedures by which an elector


can request to have his or her signature removed from the petition.


Any petition not filed in accordance with this provision shall not


be considered. The proponent or proponents of an initiative


petition, any time before the final submission of signatures, may


withdraw the initiative petition upon written notification to the


Secretary of State.


F. Signature-gathering Deadline for Referendum Petitions. All


signed signatures supporting a referendum petition shall be filed


with the Secretary of State not later than ninety (90) days after


the adjournment of the legislative session in which the measure


which is the subject of the referendum petition was enacted.


G. 1. Any person who circulates the petition to collect


signatures shall disclose to the Secretary of State any employer or


entity that is compensating the person for the circulation of the


petition. No compensation shall be based on number of signatures


collected, number of signature sheets submitted, or any other


similar incentives. No person or entity who does not reside or do


business in this state shall contribute to or compensate a person


for circulation of a petition. Any person or entity that employs a


person for circulation of a petition shall follow federal labor


standards; and.

Req. No. 2898 Page 5


2. Any person or entity expending funds on the circulation of a


petition shall submit a weekly report to the Secretary of State that


details such expenditures and that attests that all donated funds


were received from sources in this state. The Secretary of State


shall publish such reports on the Secretary’s website until the vote


on the measure has occurred.


H. 1. The total number of signatures collected to meet the


requirements for an initiative petition or referendum petition,


amending the Oklahoma Statutes, from a single county shall not


exceed eleven and five-tenths percent (11.5%) of the number of votes


cast in that county during the most recent statewide general


election for Governor. The State Election Board shall determine the


number of votes cast in each county; and.


2. The total number of signatures collected to meet the


requirements for an initiative petition or referendum petition,


amending the Oklahoma Constitution, from a single county shall not


exceed twenty and eight-tenths percent (20.8%) of the number of


votes cast in that county during the most recent statewide general


election for Governor. The State Election Board shall determine the


number of votes cast in each county.


I. The proponent or proponents of a referendum or an initiative


petition may terminate the circulation period any time during the


ninety-day circulation period by certifying to the Secretary of


State that:

Req. No. 2898 Page 6


1. All signed petitions have already been filed with the


Secretary of State;


2. No more petitions are in circulation; and


3. The proponent or proponents will not circulate any more


petitions.


If the Secretary of State receives such a certification from the


proponent or proponents, the Secretary of State shall begin the


counting and review process.


J. When the signed copies of a petition pamphlet are timely


filed, the Secretary of State shall file a copy of the proponent’s


ballot title with the Attorney General and, after conducting a count


and review of the filed, signed petition pamphlets, the Secretary of


State shall certify to the Supreme Court of the state:


1. The total number of signatures counted pursuant to


procedures set forth in this title; and


2. The total number of votes cast for the office of Governor at


the last general election.


The Supreme Court shall make the determination of the numerical


sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures counted and reviewed


by the Secretary of State.


K. Upon order of the Supreme Court, it shall be the duty of the


Secretary of State to forthwith cause to be published, in at least


one newspaper of general circulation in the state, a notice of the


filing of the signed petitions and the apparent sufficiency or

Req. No. 2898 Page 7


insufficiency thereof, and shall to also publish the text of the


ballot title as reviewed and approved or, if applicable, as


rewritten by the Attorney General pursuant to the provisions of


subsection D of Section 9 of this title and notice that any citizen


or citizens of the state may file an objection to the count made by


the Secretary of State, by a written notice to the Supreme Court and


to the proponent or proponents filing the petition. Any such


objection shall be filed within ninety (90) days after publication


and shall relate only to the validity or number of the signatures or


a challenge to the ballot title. A copy of the objection to the


count or ballot title shall be filed with the Supreme Court, the


Attorney General, and the Secretary of State.


L. Upon appeal and if ordered or directed by the Supreme Court,


the Secretary of State shall deliver the bound volumes of signatures


to the Supreme Court.


M. Upon the filing of an objection to the signature count or


ballot title, the Supreme Court shall resolve the objection with


dispatch. The Supreme Court shall adopt rules to govern proceedings


to apply to the challenge of a measure on the grounds that the


proponent or proponents failed to gather sufficient signatures.


N. If in the opinion of the Supreme Court, any objection to the


count or protest to the petition is frivolous, the Court may impose


appropriate sanctions, including an award of costs and attorney fees


to either party as the Court deems equitable.

Req. No. 2898 Page 8


O. Whenever reference is made in this act section to the


Supreme Court, such reference shall include the members of the


Supreme Court, or any officer constitutionally designated to perform


the duties herein prescribed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2898 BLB 1/15/2026 2:10:04 PM



































Req. No. 2898 Page 9